Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.270

Presumption of validity of assignment.

In any action brought by licensee to collect the claim of his, her, or its customer, the assignment of the claim to licensee by his, her, or its customer shall be conclusively presumed valid, if the assignment is filed in court with the complaint, unless objection is made thereto by the debtor in a written answer or in writing five days or more prior to trial.

[ 2011 c 336 s 522; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 18.]